Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Military Justice.
Sec. 26.05.500.
Investigation; preliminary hearing.

A charge or specification may not be referred to a general court-martial for trial until an investigating officer makes a thorough and impartial investigation of all the matters set out in the charge or specification. The investigating officer shall inquire into the truth of the matters set out in the charges, consider the form of the charges, and recommend a disposition of the case in the interest of justice and discipline.

The accused has the right to be represented by counsel at an investigation. If the accused requests the appointment of military counsel, the investigating officer shall refer the request to the senior force judge advocate, who shall promptly detail defense counsel to represent the accused at the investigation. Defense counsel detailed under this section shall meet the criteria for counsel under AS

26.05.475(d)

.

In cases where there has been no grand jury proceeding on a charge or no grand jury proceeding is required, the authority investigating the accused shall

advise the accused of the charges against the accused and of the accused’s right to be represented by counsel under (b) of this section;

give the accused the opportunity to cross-examine witnesses against the accused, if the witnesses are available; a victim of an offense under AS

26.05.770

or

26.05.890

—

26.05.900

may not be required to testify at a preliminary hearing; a victim of an offense under AS

26.05.770

or

26.05.890

—

26.05.900

who declines to testify is considered unavailable for the purposes of the preliminary hearing;

give the accused the opportunity to present evidence on the accused’s own behalf, either in defense or mitigation relevant to the limited purposes of the hearing; the investigating officer shall examine available witnesses requested by the accused.

The presentation of evidence and examination of witnesses at a preliminary hearing, including cross-examination, shall be limited to matters relevant to the limited purposes of the hearing.

If, after the investigation, the charges are referred to the court-martial, the investigating officer shall prepare a statement of the charges and the substance of the testimony taken, and a copy shall be given to the accused.

If an investigation of an offense under this chapter is conducted before the accused is charged with the offense and the accused is present at the investigation and provided with counsel and an opportunity to cross-examine witnesses and present evidence under (c) of this section, no further investigation of that charge is necessary under this section unless the accused demands further investigation after the accused is informed of the charge. A demand for further investigation entitles the accused to recall witnesses for further cross-examination and to offer new evidence in the accused’s own behalf.

If evidence adduced in an investigation under this section indicates that the accused committed an uncharged offense, the investigating officer may investigate the subject matter of that offense without the accused’s having first been charged with an offense under this chapter if the accused is

present at the investigation;

informed of the nature of each uncharged offense investigated; and

provided with counsel and an opportunity to cross-examine witnesses and present evidence under (c) of this section.

In this section, “victim” means a person who is alleged to have suffered a direct physical, emotional, or pecuniary harm as a result of the matters set out in a charge or specification being considered and who is named in a specification being considered.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.468; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected and "AS

26.05.770

or

26.05.890

—

26.05.900

" was substituted for "AS 26.05.593,

26.05.620

, 26.05.621, or 26.05.622" in paragraph (c)(2) to correct a manifest error.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.505.
Forwarding of charges.

When a person is held for trial by general court-martial, the commanding officer shall, within eight days after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation and associated records, to the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction.

If it is not practicable to forward the charges and investigation and associated records under (a) of this section, the commanding officer shall provide the person with a written explanation for the delay as soon as possible.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.470

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.510.
Advice of judge advocate and reference for trial.

Before directing the trial of a charge by general court-martial, the convening authority shall refer it to a judge advocate for consideration and advice. The convening authority may not refer a specification under a charge to a general court-martial for trial unless the convening authority has been advised in writing by a judge advocate that

the specification alleges an offense under this chapter;

the specification is warranted by the evidence set out in the report of investigation under AS

26.05.500

, if there is a report; and

a court-martial has jurisdiction over the accused and the offense.

The advice of the judge advocate under (a) of this section with respect to a specification under a charge shall include a written and signed statement by the judge advocate

stating the judge advocate’s conclusions with respect to each matter set out in (a) of this section; and

recommending to the convening authority what action to take regarding the specification; if the specification is referred for trial, the recommendation of the judge advocate must accompany the specification.

If a charge or specification is not in the correct form or does not conform to the substance of the evidence set out in the investigating officer’s report, the convening authority, with the advice of the judge advocate, may correct the charge or specification to conform to the evidence.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.473; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.515.
Service of charges.

A trial counsel shall serve or cause to be served on the accused a copy of the charges. A person may not, against the person’s objection, be brought to trial before a general court-martial within five days after the service of charges on the person, or before a special court-martial within three days after the service of charges on the person.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.475

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.520.
Unlawfully influencing the action of a court.

An authority convening a general, special, or summary court-martial, a commanding officer, or an officer serving on the staff of a convening authority or commanding officer may not censure, reprimand, or admonish the court, a member of the court, the military judge, or counsel appearing before the court, with respect to the findings of or sentence imposed by the court, or with respect to another exercise of the respective functions of the court, a member of the court, the military judge, or counsel appearing before the court in the conduct of the proceedings.

A member of the militia may not attempt to coerce or, by unauthorized means, influence the action of a court-martial or a member of a court in reaching the findings or sentence in a case, or the action of a convening, approving, or reviewing authority with respect to a judicial act. This subsection does not apply to

general instructional or informational courses in military justice if the courses are designed solely for the purpose of instructing members of a command in the substantive and procedural aspects of courts-martial; or

statements and instructions given in open court by the military judge, summary court-martial officer, or counsel.

A member of the militia may not, in the preparation of an effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency report, or any other report or document used, in whole or in part, for the purpose of determining whether a member of the militia of the state is qualified to be advanced in grade, in determining the assignment or transfer of a member of the militia of the state, or in determining whether a member of the militia of the state should be retained on active status,

consider or evaluate the performance of duty of the member as a member of a court-martial or witness; or

give a less favorable rating or evaluation of any counsel for the accused because of zealous representation before a court-martial.

In this section, “unauthorized” means contrary to a statute or regulation of the United States or the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.478; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.525.
Continuances.

The military judge of a general, special, or summary court-martial may, for reasonable cause, grant a continuance to a party for the time, and as often, as justice requires.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.480

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.530.
Oaths or affirmations.

Before performing their respective duties, military judges, general and special court-martial members, trial counsel, defense counsel, reporters, and interpreters shall take an oath or affirmation in the presence of the accused that they will perform their duties faithfully.

The form of the oath or affirmation, the time and place of taking, the manner of recording, and a determination of whether the oath or affirmation shall be taken for all cases in which the duties are to be performed or for a particular case, shall be prescribed by rules of procedure. The rules may provide that, if a person takes an oath or affirmation with respect to a duty, the person need not take the oath or affirmation again on detailment to the duty.

A witness before a court-martial shall be examined under oath or affirmation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.483; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.535.
Statute of limitations.

A person charged with an offense under this chapter may not be tried or punished for the offense unless the person received sworn charges and specifications issued by an officer exercising court-martial jurisdiction over the command not later than three years after the commission of the offense or not later than two years after commission of the offense if the imposition of nonjudicial punishment is sought for the offense under the code of military justice.

A period when the accused is absent without authority or fleeing from justice shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation in this section.

A period when the accused is absent from territory in which the proper authority has the ability to apprehend the accused, in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation in this section.

When the United States is at war declared by the United States Congress or engaged in contingency operations ordered by the President of the United States, and those operations actually prevented the discovery of the offending behavior or the timely bringing of charges, as determined by a military judge at court-martial, the running of a period of limitation for an offense under this chapter is suspended until two years after the termination of hostilities as proclaimed by the President of the United States or by a joint resolution of the United States Congress if the offense

involves fraud or attempted fraud against the United States, a state, or an agency of either, including a conspiracy to commit fraud;

is committed in connection with the acquisition, care, handling, custody, control, or disposition of real or personal property of the United States or a state; or

is committed in connection with the negotiation, procurement, award, performance, payment, interim financing, cancellation, or other termination or settlement, of a contract, subcontract, or purchase order that is connected with or related to the prosecution of the war, or with the disposition of inventory by a war contractor or government agency.

If charges or specifications are dismissed as defective or insufficient for any cause, and the period prescribed by the applicable statute of limitations has expired or will expire within 180 days after the date of dismissal of the charges and specifications, trial and punishment under new charges and specifications are not barred by the statute of limitations if the new charges and specifications

are received by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command within 180 days after the dismissal of the charges or specifications;

allege the same acts or omissions that were alleged in the dismissed charges or specifications or acts or omissions that were included in the dismissed charges or specifications.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.485

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.540.
Former jeopardy.

Former jeopardy protections provided to a member of the militia are equivalent to those provided under art. I, sec. 9, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and under the Double Jeopardy Clause of the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.488; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.545.
Pleas of the accused.

If, after arraignment, an accused makes an irregular pleading or, after a plea of guilty, initiates an action inconsistent with the plea, or if the accused appears to have entered the plea of guilty improvidently or through lack of understanding of its meaning and effect, or if the accused fails or refuses to plead, a plea of not guilty shall be entered in the record, and the court shall proceed as though the accused had pleaded not guilty.

With respect to a charge or specification to which a plea of guilty has been made by the accused and accepted by the military judge or by a court-martial without a military judge, a finding of guilty of the charge or specification may be entered immediately without vote. This finding shall constitute the finding of the court unless the plea of guilty is withdrawn before announcement of the sentence, in which event, the proceedings shall continue as though the accused had pleaded not guilty.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.490

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.550.
Subpoena; process of military courts.

A military judge, the president of a court-martial, or a summary court-martial officer may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum for the attendance of witnesses and production of books and records, if the courts are sitting within the state and the witnesses, books, and records sought are located in the state. A subpoena may be served by a person designated by the military judge, the president of the court-martial, or summary court-martial officer.

If a person who is not a member of the militia of the state fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this section, the military judge, president of the court-martial, or summary court-martial officer may apply to a state court for an order to compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as if the subpoena had been issued by a court. The military judge, president of the court-martial, or summary court-martial officer may request the attorney general to bring the action.

A person who is not a member of the militia, who has been subpoenaed to appear as a witness or to produce books and records before a court-martial or before a military or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before a court-martial, who has been paid or tendered the fees and mileage of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending a criminal court of the state, and who wilfully neglects or refuses to appear or refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce evidence that the person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce is guilty of a violation and may be charged and punished as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.493; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.555.
Contempt.

A military judge or summary court-martial officer may punish for contempt a person who

uses a menacing word, sign, or gesture in its presence;

disturbs its proceedings by any riot or disorder; or

wilfully disobeys a lawful writ, process, order, rule, decree, or command of the military judge or summary court-martial officer.

A military judge or summary court-martial officer may punish a member of the militia for contempt as provided in AS

09.50.020

for civil contempt.

A military judge or summary court-martial officer may punish a person who is not a member of the militia for direct contempt as provided in AS

09.50.020

for civil contempt.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 10 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.495

; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (a)(3), and made related and stylistic changes.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.560.
Defense of insanity.

The accused may assert the affirmative defense of insanity as provided in AS

12.47.010

. If the accused gives notice of the defense, the accused shall file with the military judge the notice required by AS

12.47.090

.

If the accused asserts the defense of insanity under (a) of this section, the court shall order an examination to be conducted that meets the standards of AS

12.47.070

.

If the defense of insanity is properly at issue, the military judge shall instruct the members of the court as to the defense and charge them to find the accused

guilty;

not guilty; or

not guilty by reason of insanity.

The accused may be found not guilty by reason of insanity if

a majority of the members of the court-martial present at the time the vote is taken determine that the defense of insanity has been established; or

in the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge or a summary court-martial officer sitting without court members, the military judge or summary court-martial officer determines that the defense of insanity has been established.

In the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge or a summary court-martial officer sitting without court members, if the defense of insanity is properly at issue, the military judge or summary court-martial officer shall find the accused

guilty;

not guilty; or

not guilty by reason of insanity.

If an accused is found not guilty by reason of insanity, trial counsel shall, within 24 hours, file a petition under AS

47.30.700

for a screening investigation to determine the need for treatment if trial counsel has good cause to believe that the defendant is suffering from a mental illness and, as a result, is gravely disabled or likely to cause serious harm to self or others. In this subsection, “mental illness” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.498; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.565.
Lack of mental capacity or mental responsibility; commitment of accused for examination and treatment.

An accused who, as a result of a mental disease or defect that renders the accused incompetent to the extent that the accused is unable to understand the nature of the proceedings or to conduct or cooperate intelligently in the defense of the case, may not be tried, convicted, or sentenced for an offense under this chapter as long as the incompetency exists.

If trial counsel or defense counsel has reason to believe that the accused is unable to understand the nature of the proceedings or to conduct or cooperate intelligently in the defense of the case, counsel may file a motion with the military judge assigned to the case for a determination of the competency of the accused. Upon the motion, or on the judge’s own motion, the court shall order an examination to be conducted and make a determination in accordance with the requirements of AS

12.47.100

. If the military judge determines that the accused must be committed for the purpose of examination, and the accused is not otherwise subject to commitment under AS

47.30.700

-

47.30.915

, the military judge shall order the convening authority to seek the assistance of the attorney general in seeking a commitment under AS

12.47.100

.

If the military court determines that the accused is incompetent to stand trial and the accused is not otherwise subject to commitment under AS

47.30.700

-

47.30.915

, the military judge shall order the convening authority to seek the assistance of the attorney general in seeking a commitment under AS

12.47.110

.

If, at the end of a period of commitment under (b) and (c) of this section, it is determined that the accused’s mental condition has not improved so as to permit the trial to proceed, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and continued commitment proceedings shall be governed by the provisions relating to civil commitment under AS

47.30.700

-

47.30.915

. If the accused remains incompetent for five years after the charges have been dismissed under this subsection, the accused may not be charged again for an offense under this chapter arising out of the facts alleged in the original charges.

When the custodian of an accused person hospitalized under (c) of this section determines that the person has recovered to the extent that the accused is able to understand the nature of the proceedings against the accused and to conduct or cooperate intelligently in the defense of the case, the custodian shall promptly transmit a notification of the determination to the general court-martial convening authority for the accused and trial and defense counsel.

Upon receipt of the notice, the convening authority shall promptly take custody of the accused unless the accused is no longer a member of the militia.

If the accused remains a member of the militia, the military judge detailed to the case shall conduct the hearing required under AS

12.47.120

. If the judge finds the accused competent, the court-martial shall be assembled.

The custodian of the accused person may retain custody of the person for not more than 30 days after transmitting the notifications required under (e) of this section.

If, during a period of commitment under this section, the accused is no longer a member of the militia, the convening authority shall promptly notify the custodian and the attorney general; the custodian and the attorney general may take further action that is legally permissible.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.500

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.570.
Voting and rulings.

Voting by members of a general or special court-martial on the findings and on the sentence shall be by secret written ballot. The junior member of the court shall count the votes. The count shall be checked by the president, who shall immediately announce the result of the ballot to the members of the court on the record, in an open court, and in the presence of all parties to the trial.

The military judge shall rule on all questions of law and all interlocutory questions arising during the proceedings. A ruling made by the military judge on a question of law or an interlocutory question, other than the factual issue of mental responsibility of the accused, is final and constitutes the ruling of the court. However, the military judge may change the ruling at any time during the trial before a vote is taken on the findings. Unless the ruling is final, if a member objects to a ruling, the court shall be cleared and closed, and the question shall be decided by a voice vote as provided in AS

26.05.575

, beginning with the junior in rank.

Before a vote is taken on the findings, the military judge shall, in the presence of the accused and counsel, instruct the members of the court as to the elements of the offense under this chapter and charge them that

the accused is presumed to be innocent until the guilt of the accused is established by legal and competent evidence beyond a reasonable doubt;

if there is a reasonable doubt as to the guilt of the accused, the doubt must be resolved in favor of the accused, and the accused must be acquitted;

if there is a reasonable doubt as to the degree of guilt, a finding of guilt must be in a lower degree as to which there is no reasonable doubt; and

the burden of proof to establish the guilt of the accused beyond a reasonable doubt is on the state.

A military judge sitting without court members shall

determine all questions of law and fact arising during the proceedings and, if the accused is convicted, adjudge an appropriate sentence;

make a general finding and shall, in addition, on request, find the facts specially.

If a military judge sitting without court members files an opinion or memorandum of decision, the opinion or memorandum of decision is sufficient if the findings of fact appear in the opinion or memorandum of decision.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.503; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.575.
Number of votes required.

A person may not be convicted of an offense under this chapter that is tried by a court-martial unless by the unanimous verdict of the members of the court present at the time the vote is taken.

All other questions to be decided by the members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority vote, but a determination to reconsider a finding of guilty or to reconsider a sentence, with a view toward decreasing it, may be made by any lesser vote that indicates that the reconsideration is not opposed by the number of votes required for that finding or sentence. A tie vote on a challenge disqualifies the member challenged. A tie vote on any other question is a determination in favor of the accused.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.505

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.580.
Record of trial.

Each general and special court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case brought before it, and the record must be authenticated by the signature of the military judge. If the military judge cannot authenticate the record because of the military judge’s death, disability, or absence, the record shall be authenticated by the signature of the trial counsel or, if the trial counsel is unable to authenticate the record because of the trial counsel’s death, disability, or absence, then by the signature of a member of the court. In a court-martial consisting of only a military judge, the record shall be authenticated by the court reporter under the same conditions that would impose a duty on a member under this subsection.

In each general and special court-martial case resulting in a conviction, a complete verbatim record of the proceedings and testimony shall be prepared. In all other court-martial cases, the record must contain the matters as may be prescribed by rules of procedure.

Each summary court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case, and the record shall be authenticated in the manner as may be prescribed by rules of procedure.

A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as the record is authenticated.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.508; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.585.
Cruel and unusual punishments prohibited.

A court-martial may not impose on a member of the militia punishment by flogging, branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or another cruel or unusual punishment. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.510

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.590.
Punishments; maximum limits.

A court-martial may not impose a punishment that exceeds the limits set out in the code of military justice and may not impose a sentence of death. A sentence of confinement imposed under this chapter may not exceed 10 years. An offense under this chapter that is punishable by a term of confinement of more than one year is a felony offense. Except for convictions by a summary court-martial and except as otherwise specifically provided in the code of military justice, all other offenses under this chapter are misdemeanors. A conviction by a summary court-martial is a violation.

A nonjudicial punishment may not include a sentence of confinement or separation from military service.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 11 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.513; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, in (a), in the third sentence, substituted “that is punishable by a term of confinement of more than one year” for “for which a sentence of confinement for a term of more than one year is imposed” following “under this chapter”, in the fourth sentence, deleted “for which a sentence of confinement for a term of one year or less is imposed” near the end. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until August 13, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was August 14, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.595.
Deferment of sentences.

If an accused is under sentence to confinement that has not yet been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under the convening authority’s jurisdiction, the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently detailed may, in that person’s sole discretion, defer service of the sentence to confinement. The deferment terminates when the sentence is ordered to be executed. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the authority who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under that person’s jurisdiction, by the person exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently detailed.

If a court-martial sentences an accused to confinement, the convening authority may, without the consent of the accused, defer the service of the sentence until after the accused has been permanently released to the militia of the state by a state, the United States, or a foreign country

that had custody of the accused;

that temporarily returned the accused to the militia of the state for trial by court-martial; and

to which, after the court-martial, the militia of the state returned the accused under the authority of a mutual agreement or treaty.

In a case in which a court-martial sentences an accused to confinement and the sentence to confinement has been ordered executed, but in which review of the case under AS

26.05.615

,

26.05.640

, or

26.05.645

is pending, the adjutant general may defer further service of the sentence to confinement while that review is pending.

In (b) of this section, “state” includes the District of Columbia and any commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.515

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.600.
Execution of confinement.

A person must serve a sentence of confinement imposed by a court-martial, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal from the militia of the state, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed. The sentence may be carried into execution by confinement in a place authorized by the code of military justice. A person confined under the code of military justice is subject to the same discipline and treatment as other persons confined or committed to the place of confinement.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.518; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.605.
Error of law; lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

A reviewing authority authorized under the code of military justice to approve or affirm a finding of guilt may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.520

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.610.
Withdrawal of appeal.

In a case subject to appellate review under the code of military justice, the accused may, at any time, file with the convening authority a written statement expressly withdrawing the right of the accused to the appeal. The withdrawal shall be signed by both the accused and the accused’s defense counsel and filed in accordance with rules of procedure.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.523; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.